Illinois, session 104th, SB3393.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Fire Sprinkler Contractor Licensing Act is 5amended by changing Section 35 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 317/35)7    Sec. 35. Fees, renewals, continuing education, and 8required insurance. 9    (a) The fees for an initial license and each renewal and 10for duplicate copies of licenses shall be determined by the 11Office by rule. 12    (b) Each license shall be renewed every 2 years. Each 13licensee shall complete at least 16 hours of continuing 14education in the 2-year period following the licensee's 15renewal or initial licensure, with at least 8 hours of 16continuing education completed during each year of the current 17license.18    To satisfy the continuing education requirement for fire 19sprinkler contractors, continuing education shall be completed 20by the designated certified person or responsible managing 21employee on behalf of the fire sprinkler contractor licensee. 22Current licensure as a professional engineer or proof of 23current NICET Level III or IV certification in water-based   SB3393 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 17748 TRT 31179 b1fire protection systems layout shall satisfy the continuing 2education requirement for designated certified persons. 3    Continuing education offered through nationally recognized 4building and fire code organizations and their affiliates; 5nationally recognized fire sprinkler organizations and their 6affiliates; institutions of higher education; educational 7bodies specializing in automatic fire suppression system 8technology; as well as other entities approved by the Office 9shall be also acceptable. All continuing education entities 10seeking to be approved providers of continuing education shall 11make application to the Office and offer programs that:12        (1) contribute to the advancement, extension, or 13    enhancement of the professional skills or technical 14    knowledge of the licensee in the practice of fire 15    sprinkler contracting; and 16        (2) are developed and presented by persons with 17    education or experience in the subject manner of the 18    program. 19    (c) Any person who fails to file a renewal application by 20the date of expiration of a license shall be assessed a late 21filing fee, which shall be determined by the Office by rule.22    (d) Any fee required by this Act is not refundable in the 23event that the initial application or application for renewal 24is denied.25    (e) Every application for an initial license or renewal of 26a fire sprinkler contractor license shall be accompanied by a   SB3393 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 17748 TRT 31179 b1certificate of insurance issued by an insurance company 2authorized to do business in the State of Illinois or by a risk 3retention or purchasing group formed pursuant to the federal 4Liability Risk Retention Act of 1986, which provides primary, 5first dollar public liability coverage of the applicant or 6licensee for personal injuries for not less than $500,000 per 7person or $1,000,000 per occurrence, and, in addition, for not 8less than $1,000,000 per occurrence for property damage. The 9insurance policy shall be in effect at all times during the 10license year and a new certificate of insurance shall be filed 11with the Office within 30 days after the renewal of the 12insurance policy.13    (f) The Office shall prepare a report evaluating the 14effectiveness and industry impacts of the continuing education 15requirements established under this Section. The report 16required under this subsection shall include recommendations 17for statutory or rule changes and shall be delivered to the 18General Assembly by December 31, 2026. 19(Source: P.A. 102-612, eff. 8-27-21.) 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.